District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.02a

Collection on behalf of the University of the District of Columbia.

Funds collected and recovered by the Central Collection Unit, beginning in fiscal year 2014 and continuing in the following fiscal years, arising out of delinquent debts transferred and referred to the Central Collection Unit by the University of the District of Columbia for collection, net of cost and fees, shall be deposited into the University of the District of Columbia Debt Collection Fund established pursuant to § 38-1251.01, by the Central Collection Unit within 60 days following the then current fiscal year.

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1043a
as added Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7032(b), 60 DCR 12472
University of the District of Columbia Debt Collection Fund, § 38-1251.01.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Delinquent Debt Recovery Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.